Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1278.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 63RESIDENTIAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT DISTRICTGRANT PROGRAMSec.6301. Definitions.6302. Residential Economic Development District Grant Program.6303. Submission to department.6304. Residential Economic Development District Fund.§ 6301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 12345678910111213141516171819 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Fund." The Residential Economic Development District Fund established under section 6304(a) (relating to Residential Economic Development District Fund)."Major economic development project." A project in this Commonwealth that meets both of the following criteria:(1) the project is reasonably expected to create, retain and attract jobs or otherwise improve the economic well-being of the area surrounding the project site; and(2) at least $250,000,000 in private investments are committed to establish, expand, renovate or occupy a facility as part of a single project at a designated project site, including investment in new buildings, additions or improvements to existing buildings, machinery, equipment, furniture, fixtures and inventory."Major workforce housing project." A project that reserves at least 50 units designed for residential occupancy by at least 50 individuals or families living independently from each other."Program." The Residential Economic Development District Grant Program established under section 6302 (relating to Residential Economic Development District Grant Program)."Pro-housing-development policy." Any of the following:(1) Having a process in place to increase the rate at which permits for housing developments are reviewed.(2) Having a preapproval process in place for an expedited review of permits for a diverse range of housing developers.(3) Subsidizing or decreasing costs related to water or 20260SB1278PN1587 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sewer connections and extensions for major workforce housing projects.(4) Acquiring and readying sites that are ready to be financed and built upon by developers.(5) Reducing or eliminating impact, inspection and plan review fees for housing developers.(6) Adopting a zoning plan that includes promoting higher density, small lot size and minimum setback requirements.(7) Developing a comprehensive plan that promotes diverse residential development options.(8) Having no or minimal parking requirements for developments that include residential units as a matter of right.(9) Conducting a traffic study, improving water or sewer infrastructure, improving roads or permitting both rigid and flexible pavement types.(10) Developing partnerships to expand the provision of sewer and water services to new areas.(11) Promoting the use of nontraditional building structures such as modular or manufactured homes.(12) Allowing accessory dwelling units as a matter of right.(13) Allowing for duplex, triplex and quadplex dwellings as a matter of right.(14) Eliminating height restrictions as a matter of right."Residential economic development district." All parcels of land within a 20-mile radius of a major economic development project.20260SB1278PN1587 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 6302. Residential Economic Development District Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Residential Economic Development District Grant Program is established within the department for the purpose of encouraging major workforce housing projects in areas of this Commonwealth that otherwise would not attract such developments and to increase home ownership among residents of this Commonwealth.(b) Applicants.--A county or municipal corporation that is fully or partially located within a residential economic development district may apply for a grant under the program.(c) Duties of department.--The department shall establish guidelines necessary to implement and administer this chapter. The guidelines shall address application procedures, scoring metrics and grant distribution.§ 6303. Submission to department.(a) Application.--A county or municipal corporation may submit an application independently or in collaboration with a housing developer or one or more other counties or municipal corporations. The application shall, at minimum, include documentation or other evidence that proves, to the satisfaction of the department, that the applicant has done or has imminent plans to do both of the following within the district:(1) adopt and implement pro-housing-development policies; and(2) approve a major workforce housing project.(b) Award of grants.--The department shall review applications and award grants under the program on a rolling basis, to the extent that funds are available.(c) Determination.--The department shall evaluate 20260SB1278PN1587 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applications and determine the amount of each grant awarded in accordance with scoring metrics that give preference to counties and municipal corporations that adopt more pro-housing-development policies in terms of both quantity and impact.(d) Revocation.--If a county or municipal corporation is approved for a grant under the program based on imminent plans to adopt and implement pro-housing-development policies and approve a major workforce housing project, the department shall confirm that the county or municipal corporation follows through with the plans, as described in the grant application, before disbursing grant funds. The department may revoke approval if the applicant fails to meet minimum requirements set by the department.(e) Limitations.--A grant recipient shall use the funds only for the following purposes:(1) Providing capital for housing development through grants or loans.(2) Acquiring and readying sites for development.(3) Providing financial assistance for housing-related or other infrastructure projects, including road improvements and water or sewer connections.(4) Addressing additional service or public safety needs due to increases in population, except that expenditures under this paragraph may not exceed 30% of the grant amount.(5) Any other purpose deemed appropriate by the department.§ 6304. Residential Economic Development District Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Residential Economic Development District Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of providing grants under section 6302 20260SB1278PN1587 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to Residential Economic Development District Grant Program).(b) Continuing appropriation.--Money in the fund is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose under subsection (a).(c) Investment earnings.--All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund.(d) Administrative costs.--The department may use no more than 10% of money appropriated from the fund under subsection (b) for costs incurred in administering the program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1278PN1587 - 6 - 1234567891011